Utah statutes.
31A-33-103.   Legal nature of Workers' Compensation Fund.

(1)  The Workers' Compensation Fund is:

(a)  a nonprofit, self-supporting, quasi-public corporation; and

(b)  a legal entity, that may sue and be sued in its own name.

(2)  All of the business and affairs of the corporation shall be conducted in the name of the Workers' Compensation Fund or if conducted through a subsidiary, such other corporate names that comply with state law.

